Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 6. FOOD, DRUGS, ALCOHOL, AND HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES

SUBTITLE A. FOOD AND DRUG HEALTH REGULATIONS

CHAPTER 434. PUBLIC HEALTH PROVISIONS RELATING TO PRODUCTION OF BAKED GOODS

SUBCHAPTER A. BAKERIES

Sec. 434.001. DEFINITION. In this subchapter "bakery" means a business producing, preparing, storing, or displaying bakery products intended for sale for human consumption.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.002. BAKERY REQUIREMENTS. (a) A building used or occupied as a bakery shall be clean and properly lighted, drained, and ventilated.

(b) A bakery shall have adequate plumbing and drainage facilities, including suitable wash sinks and restroom facilities. Restroom facilities shall be separate from the rooms in which the bakery products are produced or handled. Each wash sink area and restroom facility shall be clean, sanitary, well lit, and ventilated.

(c) The floors, walls, and ceilings of a room in which dough is mixed or handled, pastry is prepared for baking, or bakery products or the ingredients of those products are otherwise handled or stored shall be clean, wholesome, and sanitary. Each opening into the room, including a window or door, shall be properly screened or otherwise protected to exclude flies.

(d) A showcase, shelf, or other place from which bakery products are sold shall at all times be clean, wholesome, covered, properly ventilated, and protected from dust and flies.

(e) A workroom may not be used for purposes other than those directly connected with the preparation, baking, storage, or handling of food. A workroom may not be used as a washing, sleeping, or living room and shall at all times be kept separate and closed from living and sleeping rooms.

(f) Each bakery shall provide, separate from the workrooms, a dressing room for the changing and hanging of wearing apparel. Each dressing room shall be kept clean at all times.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.003. SANITARY REQUIREMENTS. (a) A person may not sit or lie on any table, bench, trough, or shelf intended for dough or bakery products.

(b) Animals or fowl may not be kept or allowed in any bakery or other place where bakery products are produced or stored.

(c) A person engaged in the preparation or handling of bakery products shall wash the person's arms and hands thoroughly before beginning the preparation, mixing, or handling of ingredients used in baking. A bakery shall provide sufficient soap, washbasins, and clean towels for that purpose.

(d) A person may not use tobacco in any form in any room in which a bakery product is manufactured, wrapped, or prepared for sale.

(e) A person with a communicable disease may not work in a bakery, handle any product in the bakery, or deliver a product from the bakery.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.004. WHOLESOME INGREDIENTS REQUIRED. (a) Materials used in the production or preparation of bakery products shall be stored, handled, and maintained in a manner that protects the materials from spoiling and contamination. Materials may not be used if spoiled, contaminated, or otherwise likely to make the bakery product unwholesome or unfit as food.

(b) The ingredients used in the production of bakery products and the sale or offering for sale of those products shall comply with the laws relating to the adulteration and misbranding of food. Ingredients may not be used that may make the bakery product injurious to health.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.005. REQUIREMENTS FOR TRANSPORTATION OF BAKERY PRODUCTS. A vehicle, box, basket, or other receptacle in which bakery products are transported shall at all times be kept clean and free from dust, flies, or other contaminants.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.006. STORAGE RECEPTACLE REQUIREMENTS. (a) A box or other receptacle for the storage or receipt of bakery products shall be:

(1) constructed and placed to be free from contamination from streets, alleys, and sidewalks;

(2) raised at least 10 inches above the level of the street or sidewalk; and

(3) clean and sanitary.

(b) Bread may not be placed in a storage box with other food except other bakery products.

(c) A storage box shall be equipped with a private lock and shall be kept locked except when opened to receive or remove bakery products or when being cleaned.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.007. WEIGHT STANDARDS FOR BREAD LOAVES. (a) Loaves of bread made by persons in the business of wholesaling and retailing bread must comply with the weight standards in this section.

(b) The standard weights for a loaf of bread are:

(1) one pound;

(2) 1-1/2 pounds; or

(3) any other multiple of one pound.

(c) This section does not prohibit the sale of bread slices in properly labeled packages weighing eight ounces or less.

(d) Variations in the weight standard may not exceed one ounce a pound within 24 hours after baking.

(e) This section does not affect the authority of the Department of Agriculture under Subchapter B, Chapter 13, Agriculture Code.

(f) This section does not apply to a food service establishment as defined under Chapter 437 or a food establishment licensed under Chapter 431 as a food manufacturer.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1534, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 434.008. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person who violates this subchapter commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $25 or more than $200.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADULTERATED INGREDIENTS

Sec. 434.021. BAKING POWDER. Baking powder that contains less than 10 percent of available carbon dioxide is adulterated.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 434.022. SELF-RISING FLOUR. (a) In this section, "self-rising flour" means a combination of flour, salt, and chemical leavening ingredients. The flour must be at least of the "straight" grade, and the chemical leavening ingredients must be bicarbonate of soda and:

(1) calcium acid phosphate;

(2) sodium aluminum sulphate;

(3) cream of tartar;

(4) tartaric acid; or

(5) a combination of those ingredients.

(b) A self-rising flour or other compound by that name must produce when sold not less than one-half percent by weight of available carbon dioxide gas and may not contain more than 3-1/2 percent chemical leavening ingredients.

(c) A self-rising flour or other compound by that name that does not meet the requirements of Subsection (b) is adulterated.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.